fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-AI-1-nipaw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - nipâw - ok : # Ordinary VAIw

  
     nipâw+V+AI+Ind+1Sg:    ninipân # INDEPENDENT
     nipâw+V+AI+Ind+2Sg:    kinipân
     nipâw+V+AI+Ind+3Sg:    nipâw
     nipâw+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: nipâyiwa
     nipâw+V+AI+Ind+1Pl:    ninipânân
     nipâw+V+AI+Ind+21Pl:   [kinipânaw, kinipânânaw]
     nipâw+V+AI+Ind+2Pl:    kinipânâwâw
     nipâw+V+AI+Ind+3Pl:    nipâwak

     PV/ê+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg:    ê-nipâyân # CONJUNCT
     PV/ê+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg:    ê-nipâyan
     PV/ê+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg:    ê-nipât
     PV/ê+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ê-nipâyit
     PV/ê+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl:    ê-nipâyâhk
     PV/ê+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+21Pl:   ê-nipâyahk
     PV/ê+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl:    ê-nipâyêk
     PV/ê+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl:    ê-nipâcik

     PV/kî+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+1Sg:    nikî-nipân # PRT-INDEPENDENT
     PV/kî+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+2Sg:    kikî-nipân
     PV/kî+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+3Sg:    kî-nipâw
     PV/kî+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: kî-nipâyiwa
     PV/kî+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+1Pl:    nikî-nipânân
     PV/kî+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+21Pl:   [kikî-nipânaw, kikî-nipânânaw]
     PV/kî+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+2Pl:    kikî-nipânâwâw
     PV/kî+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+3Pl:    kî-nipâwak

     PV/ê+PV/kî+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg:    ê-kî-nipâyân # PRT-CONJUNCT
     PV/ê+PV/kî+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg:    ê-kî-nipâyan
     PV/ê+PV/kî+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg:    ê-kî-nipât
     PV/ê+PV/kî+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ê-kî-nipâyit
     PV/ê+PV/kî+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl:    ê-kî-nipâyâhk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+21Pl:   ê-kî-nipâyahk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl:    ê-kî-nipâyêk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl:    ê-kî-nipâcik


     PV/wî+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+1Sg:    niwî-nipân # FUT+INT-INDEPENDENT
     PV/wî+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+2Sg:    kiwî-nipân
     PV/wî+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+3Sg:    wî-nipâw
     PV/wî+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: wî-nipâyiwa
     PV/wî+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+1Pl:    niwî-nipânân
     PV/wî+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+21Pl:   [kiwî-nipânaw, kiwî-nipânânaw]
     PV/wî+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+2Pl:    kiwî-nipânâwâw
     PV/wî+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+3Pl:    wî-nipâwak

     PV/ê+PV/wî+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg:    ê-wî-nipâyân # FUT+INT-CONJUNCT
     PV/ê+PV/wî+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg:    ê-wî-nipâyan
     PV/ê+PV/wî+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg:    ê-wî-nipât
     PV/ê+PV/wî+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ê-wî-nipâyit
     PV/ê+PV/wî+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl:    ê-wî-nipâyâhk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+21Pl:   ê-wî-nipâyahk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl:    ê-wî-nipâyêk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl:    ê-wî-nipâcik

     PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+1Sg:    nika-nipân # FUT+DEF-INDEPENDENT
     PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+2Sg:    kika-nipân
     PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+3Sg:    ka-nipâw
     PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: ka-nipâyiwa
     PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+1Pl:    nika-nipânân
     PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+21Pl:   [kika-nipânaw, kika-nipânânaw]
     PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+2Pl:    kika-nipânâwâw
     PV/ka+nipâw+V+AI+Ind+3Pl:    ka-nipâwak
     
     nipâw+V+AI+Cond+1Sg:    nipâyâni
     nipâw+V+AI+Cond+2Sg:    nipâyani
     nipâw+V+AI+Cond+3Sg:    nipâci
     nipâw+V+AI+Cond+4Sg/Pl: nipâyici
     nipâw+V+AI+Cond+1Pl:    nipâyâhki
     nipâw+V+AI+Cond+21Pl:   [nipâyahki, nipâyahko]
     nipâw+V+AI+Cond+2Pl:    nipâyêko
     nipâw+V+AI+Cond+3Pl:    nipâtwâwi

     nipâw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg:  nipâ
     nipâw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+21Pl: nipâtân
     nipâw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Pl:  nipâk


     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: [niwî-wîci-nipâmâw] # com SET I
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nipâmâw]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: [niwî-wîci-nipâmânân]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+21Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nipâmânaw]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nipâmâwâw]
     
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: [niwî-wîci-nipâmâwak] # com SET I-Pl
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nipâmâwak]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: [niwî-wîci-nipâmânânak]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+21Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nipâmânawak]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nipâmâwâwak]

     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nipâmin] # com SET II
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nipâminân]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nipâminâwâw]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nipâminân]


     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-nipâmêw] # com SET III
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-nipâmêwak]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-nipâmêyiwa]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-nipâmimêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-nipâmimêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîci-nipâmimâwa] # com SET IV
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nipâmimâwa]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîci-nipâmimânâna]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+21Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nipâmimânawa]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nipâw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nipâmimâwâwa]
    
     

     
